Missouri, session 2026, HB2714.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 537.769, to read as follows:
537.769. 1. In any action for damages for personal injury, property damage, or
wrongful death based on negligence or an unreasonably unsafe or dangerous condition:
(1) The fact that the plaintiff may have been contributorily negligent or assumed
a risk shall not bar recovery by the plaintiff except as provided in subsection 2 of this
section; and
(2) The total damages that the plaintiff would otherwise be entitled to recover
shall be diminished in proportion to the amount of negligence or fault attributable to the
plaintiff.
2. (1) If the plaintiff's negligence or fault is determined to be fifty-one percent or
more, the plaintiff shall be barred from any recovery of damages.
(2) The trier of fact shall determine:
(a) The total amount of damages the plaintiff would have been entitled to
recover absent any contributory fault;
(b) The percentage of fault attributable to each party, including any third party
who may be at fault; and
(c) Any reduction of the plaintiff's damages in proportion to the fault allocated
to the plaintiff.
3. If multiple defendants are found liable, the court shall:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2714 2
(1) Determine each defendant's share of fault as a percentage of the total fault of
all parties, including the plaintiff;
(2) Enter judgment against each defendant in an amount proportional to that
defendant's share of the total damages, subject to the bar under subsection 2 of this
section.
4. If it is determined that the plaintiff's percentage of fault meets or exceeds the
threshold stated under subsection 2 of this section, the plaintiff shall recover no
damages. The concept of joint and several liability shall not be applied in favor of a
plaintiff whose recovery is barred under subsection 2 of this section.
5. The court shall instruct the jury on the application of comparative fault
consistent with the provisions of this section, including the determination of the
plaintiff's percentage of fault, the defendant's percentage of fault, and the bar to
recovery if the plaintiff's fault meets or exceeds fifty-one percent.
6. The provisions of this section shall apply to any cause of action accruing on or
after August 28, 2026.
✔